tests/verbs-passive.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    App:  hfst-lookup
    Gen:  ../tur.autogen.hfst
    Morph:  ../tur.automorf.hfst

Tests:

# başlan-, çiğnen-, isten-, korun-, oynan-, boyan-, yaşan-, söylen-, okun-, yıkan-
  "[twol] passives after vowels":
    ye<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : yendi
    çiğne<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : çiğnendi
    iste<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : istendi
    koru<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : korundu
    oyna<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : oynandı
    boya<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : boyandı
    yaşa<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : yaşandı
    oku<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : okundu
    yıka<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : yıkandı

  "[twol] passives after l without interceding vowel":
    kal<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : kalındı
    çal<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : çalındı
    al<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : alındı
    sil<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : silindi

  "[twol] passives after l with interceding vowel":
    başla<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : başlandı
    söyle<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : söylendi
    hazırla<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : hazırlandı
    sula<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : sulandı

  "[twol] passives after consonants":
    sor<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : soruldu
    beğen<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : beğenildi
    çevir<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : çevirildi
    kullan<v><tv><pass><past><p3><sg> : kullanıldı
